Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF886.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 HF 886 (2) 91 th/ns/md H.F. 886 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 306.48 Eminent domain power 1 restricted. 2 The department shall not exercise the power of eminent 3 domain, including as provided in chapters 6A and 6B, to acquire 4 land necessary to expand the two-lane portions of United States 5 highway 30 in accordance with a plan adopted under section 6 307A.2, subsections 3 and 5, until the department expends all 7 reasonable alternatives, if the land is part of a century farm, 8 as defined in section 403.17, subsection 10, or is residential 9 real property, as defined in section 535B.1. 10 Sec. 2. Section 307A.2, subsection 5, Code 2025, is amended 11 to read as follows: 12 5. Identify, within the primary road system, a network 13 of commercial and industrial highways in accordance with 14 section 313.2A . The improvement of this network shall be 15 considered in the development of the long-range program and 16 plan of improvements under this section . The commission shall 17 prioritize the improvement of the segment of the highway known 18 as United States highway 30 which crosses this state from the 19 Missouri river west of Missouri Valley to the Mississippi river 20 east of Clinton and shall include in its long-range program 21 under subsection 3 plans to expand all portions of the highway 22 consisting of two-lane roadways to four-lane divided roadways 23 until the entire length of the highway is made up of four-lane 24 divided roadways. 25 -1- HF 886 (2) 91 th/ns/md 1/ 1